Missouri, session 2026, HB3175.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 301, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 301.287, to read as follows:
301.287. 1. This section shall be known and referred to as "Mason's Law".
2. Beginning January 1, 2027, a resident of this state with a health condition or
disability that limits or impairs the ability to effectively communicate with law
enforcement may, at any time, apply to the department of revenue for a designation that
shall be associated with the person's motor vehicle license plate number and available to
law enforcement under the Missouri uniform law enforcement system (MULES)
established under chapter 43.
3. The initial application, which shall be on a form prescribed by the department
and made available on the department's website, shall by signed by a physician licensed
under chapter 334, or a psychologist licensed under chapter 337, certifying that:
(1) The applicant or the applicant's child, parent, or spouse has a physical or
mental health condition that is likely to impair the ability to effectively communicate
with law enforcement; and
(2) The physician or psychologist has determined that the applicant or the
applicant's child, parent, or spouse will have the communication impairment for at least
five years.
4. Upon submission of an application and approval by the department, the
department shall notify the Missouri state highway patrol of the resident's approved
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3175 2
application and the highway patrol shall prepare an entry in the Missouri uniform law
enforcement system (MULES) that indicates that the applicant or the applicant's child,
parent, or spouse has a physical or mental health condition that may impair the ability
to effectively communicate with law enforcement. Such entry shall remain active for a
period of five years, unless the applicant requests that such designation be removed
from the system. Upon expiration of the five-year period, the designation in MULES
may be reactivated upon the filing of a renewal form with the department signed by a
physician licensed under chapter 334, or a psychologist licensed under chapter 337,
certifying that:
(1) The applicant or the applicant's child, parent, or spouse has a physical or
mental health condition that is likely to impair the ability to effectively communicate
with law enforcement; and
(2) The physician or psychologist has determined that the applicant or the
applicant's child, parent, or spouse will have the communication impairment for at least
five years.
5. The department of public safety shall issue guidance and education materials
to all law enforcement agencies in this state to promote awareness of the designation
established under this section.
6. The department of revenue may promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔